src/morphology/affixes/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_CLIT
+Foc/han:%>hän   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hän%>kään  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>hän%>kö #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hän%>pä #        ;
+Qst:%>kö #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>kö%>hän #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kö%>kään    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kö%>kin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>kö%>pä   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>kö%>s    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pä #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pä%>hän #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pä%>kään    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pä%>kin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pä%>kö   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pä%>s    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>hän  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kään #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kin%>kö    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pä    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kään  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kään%>hän  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kään%>kin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kään%>kö    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kään%>pä    #        ;


! shorthands

LEXICON ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   ACRO_BACK_CLIT    ;

LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT    ;

LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT
0    ACRO_BACK_POSS   ;
0    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN ;
0    ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT
0    ACRO_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN  ;
0    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT
0    ACRO_BACK_POSS   ;
0    ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN ;
0    ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT
0    ACRO_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN  ;
0    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT
0    ACRO_BACK_POSS   ;
0    ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT
0    ACRO_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL
0   ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
0   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL
0   ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
0   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON ACRO_COMPOUND
+Use/Circ-:0-     NOMINAL   ;
